Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1861HV (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 702 Section 1. Section 10A.519, subsection 4, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) At a permanent building that meets the requirements of 3 paragraph âaâ , between June 1 and July 8 and between December 10 4 and January 3 each year, all dates inclusive . 5 Sec. 2. Section 331.301, subsection 17, Code 2025, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 17. The board of supervisors may by ordinance or resolution 8 prohibit or limit the use of consumer fireworks or display 9 fireworks, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than 10 July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 11 727.2, subsection 4, if the board determines that the use of 12 such devices would constitute a threat to public safety or 13 private property, or if the board determines that the use 14 of such devices would constitute a nuisance to neighboring 15 landowners. 16 Sec. 3. Section 364.2, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 6. A city council may by ordinance or resolution prohibit 19 or limit the use of consumer fireworks, display fireworks, or 20 novelties, as described in section 727.2 , on any day other than 21 July 3, July 4, and December 31 in accordance with section 22 727.2, subsection 4 . 23